North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-12.2 Uniform Interstate Family Support Act
14-12.2-22. (310)
Duties of state information agency. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services is the state information agency under this chapter.

The state information agency shall:

Compile and maintain a current list, including addresses, of the tribunals in this state which have jurisdiction under this chapter and any support enforcement agencies in this state and transmit a copy to the state information agency of every other state.

Maintain a register of names and addresses of tribunals and support enforcement agencies received from other states.

Forward to the appropriate tribunal in the county in this state in which the obligee who is an individual or the obligor resides, or in which the obligor’s property is believed to be located, all documents concerning a proceeding under this chapter received from another state or foreign country.

Obtain information concerning the location of the obligor and the obligor’s property within this state not exempt from execution, by such means as postal verification and federal or state locator services, examination of telephone directories, requests for the obligor’s address from employers, and examination of governmental records, including, to the extent not prohibited by other law, those relating to real property, vital statistics, law enforcement, taxation, motor vehicles, driver’s licenses, and social security.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 24.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-22. (310)
Duties of state information agency. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services is the state information agency under this chapter.

The state information agency shall:

Compile and maintain a current list, including addresses, of the tribunals in this state which have jurisdiction under this chapter and any support enforcement agencies in this state and transmit a copy to the state information agency of every other state.

Maintain a register of names and addresses of tribunals and support enforcement agencies received from other states.

Forward to the appropriate tribunal in the county in this state in which the obligee who is an individual or the obligor resides, or in which the obligor’s property is believed to be located, all documents concerning a proceeding under this chapter received from another state or foreign country.

Obtain information concerning the location of the obligor and the obligor’s property within this state not exempt from execution, by such means as postal verification and federal or state locator services, examination of telephone directories, requests for the obligor’s address from employers, and examination of governmental records, including, to the extent not prohibited by other law, those relating to real property, vital statistics, law enforcement, taxation, motor vehicles, driver’s licenses, and social security.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 24; 2021, ch. 352, § 42, effective September 1, 2022.

14-12.2-23. (311)
Pleadings and accompanying documents.

In a proceeding under this chapter, a petitioner seeking to establish a support order, to determine parentage, or to register and modify a support order of a tribunal of another state or foreign country must file a petition. Unless otherwise ordered under section 14-12.2-24, the petition or accompanying documents must provide, so far as known, the name, residential address, and social security numbers of the obligor and the obligee or the parent and alleged parent, and the name, sex, residential address, social security number, and date of birth of each child for whose benefit support is sought or whose parentage is to be determined. Unless filed at the time of registration, the petition must be accompanied by a copy of any support order known to have been issued by another tribunal. The petition may include any other information that may assist in locating or identifying the respondent.

The petition must specify the relief sought. The petition and accompanying documents must conform substantially with the requirements imposed by the forms mandated by federal law for use in cases filed by a support enforcement agency.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 25.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-24. (312)
Nondisclosure of information.

If a party alleges in an affidavit or a pleading under oath that the health, safety, or liberty of a party or child would be jeopardized by disclosure of specific identifying information, that information must be sealed and may not be disclosed to the other party or the public. After a hearing in which a tribunal takes into consideration the health, safety, or liberty of the party or child, the tribunal may order disclosure of information that the tribunal determines to be in the interest of justice.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 26.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-25. (313)
Costs and fees.

The petitioner may not be required to pay a filing fee or other costs.

If an obligee prevails, a responding tribunal of this state may assess against an obligor filing fees, reasonable attorney’s fees, other costs, and necessary travel and other reasonable expenses incurred by the obligee and the obligee’s witnesses. The tribunal may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against the obligee or the support enforcement agency of either the initiating or the responding state or foreign country, except as provided by other law. Attorney’s fees may be taxed as costs, and may be ordered paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in the attorney’s own name. Payment of support owed to the obligee has priority over fees, costs, and expenses.

The tribunal shall order the payment of costs and reasonable attorney’s fees if it determines that a hearing was requested primarily for delay. In a proceeding under sections 14-12.2-35 through 14-12.2-46, a hearing is presumed to have been requested primarily for delay if a registered support order is confirmed or enforced without change.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 27.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-26. (314)
Limited immunity of petitioner.

Participation by a petitioner in a proceeding under this chapter before a responding tribunal, whether in person, by private attorney, or through services provided by the support enforcement agency, does not confer personal jurisdiction over the petitioner in another proceeding.

A petitioner is not amenable to service of civil process while physically present in this state to participate in a proceeding under this chapter.

The immunity granted by this section does not extend to civil litigation based on acts unrelated to a proceeding under this chapter committed by a party while physically present in this state to participate in the proceeding.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 28.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-27. (315)
Nonparentage as defense.

A party whose parentage of a child has been previously determined by or pursuant to law may not plead nonparentage as a defense to a proceeding under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3.

14-12.2-28. (316)
Special rules of evidence and procedure.

The physical presence of a nonresident party who is an individual in a tribunal of this state is not required for the establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order or the rendition of a judgment determining parentage.

An affidavit, a document substantially complying with federally mandated forms, or a document incorporated by reference in any of them, which would not be excluded under the hearsay rule if given in person, is admissible in evidence if given under penalty of perjury by a party or witness residing outside this state.

A copy of the record of child support payments certified as a true copy of the original by the custodian of the record may be forwarded to a responding tribunal. The copy is evidence of facts asserted in it and is admissible to show whether payments were made.

Copies of bills for testing for parentage, and for prenatal and postnatal health care of the mother and child, furnished to the adverse party at least ten days before trial, are admissible in evidence to prove the amount of the charges billed and that the charges were reasonable, necessary, and customary.

Documentary evidence transmitted from outside this state to a tribunal of this state by telephone, telecopier, or other means that do not provide an original record may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission.

In a proceeding under this chapter, a tribunal of this state shall permit a party or witness residing outside this state to be deposed or to testify by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means at a designated tribunal or other location in that state. A tribunal of this state shall cooperate with other tribunals in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

If a party called to testify at a civil hearing refuses to answer on the ground that the testimony may be self-incriminating, the trier of fact may draw an adverse inference from the refusal.

A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses does not apply in a proceeding under this chapter.

The defense of immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child does not apply in a proceeding under this chapter.

A voluntary acknowledgment of paternity, certified as a true copy, is admissible to establish parentage of the child.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 29.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-29. (317)
Communications between tribunals.

A tribunal of this state may communicate with a tribunal outside this state in a record, or by telephone or other means, to obtain information concerning the laws, the legal effect of a judgment, decree, or order of that tribunal, and the status of a proceeding. A tribunal of this state may furnish similar information by similar means to a tribunal outside this state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 30.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-30. (318)
Assistance with discovery.

A tribunal of this state may:

Request a tribunal outside this state to assist in obtaining discovery; and

Upon request, compel a person over whom it has jurisdiction to respond to a discovery order issued by a tribunal outside this state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 31.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-31. (319)
Receipt and disbursement of payments.

A support enforcement agency or tribunal of this state shall disburse promptly any amounts received pursuant to a support order, as directed by the order. The agency or tribunal shall furnish to a requesting party or tribunal of another state or foreign country a certified statement by the custodian of the record of the amounts and dates of all payments received.

If neither the obligor, nor the obligee who is an individual, nor the child resides in this state, upon request from the support enforcement agency of this state or another state, the support enforcement agency of this state or a tribunal of this state shall:

Direct that the support payment be made to the support enforcement agency in the state in which the obligee is receiving services; and

Issue and send to the obligor’s employer a conforming income-withholding order or an administrative notice of change of payee, reflecting the redirected payments.

The support enforcement agency of this state receiving redirected payments from another state pursuant to a law similar to subsection 2 shall furnish to a requesting party or tribunal of the other state a certified statement by the custodian of the record of the amount and dates of all payments received.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 32.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-32. (401)
Petition to establish support order.

If a support order entitled to recognition under this chapter has not been issued, a responding tribunal of this state with personal jurisdiction over the parties may issue a support order if:

The individual seeking the order resides outside this state; or

The support enforcement agency seeking the order is located outside this state.

The tribunal may issue a temporary child support order if the tribunal determines that such an order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is:

A presumed father of the child;

Petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

Identified as the father of the child through genetic testing;

An alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child;

An acknowledged father as provided by chapter 14-20;

The mother of the child; or

An individual who has been ordered to pay child support in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or vacated.

Upon finding, after notice and opportunity to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders under section 14-12.2-17.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 33.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-32.1. (402)
Proceeding to determine parentage.

A tribunal of this state authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage brought under this chapter or a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 34.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-33. (501)
Employer’s receipt of income-withholding order of another state.

An income-withholding order issued in another state may be sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support enforcement agency, to the person defined as the obligor’s employer under section 14-09-09.10 without first filing a petition or comparable pleading or registering the order with a tribunal of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 9; 2009, ch. 152, § 35.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-33.1. (502)
Employer’s compliance with income-withholding order of another state.

Upon receipt of an income-withholding order, the obligor’s employer shall immediately provide a copy of the order to the obligor.

The employer shall treat an income-withholding order issued in another state which appears regular on its face as if it had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection 4 and section 14-12.2-33.2, the employer shall withhold and distribute the funds as directed in the withholding order by complying with the terms of the order which specify:

The duration and amount of periodic payments of current child support, stated as a sum certain;

The person designated to receive payments and the address to which the payments are to be forwarded;

Medical support, whether in the form of periodic cash payment, stated as a sum certain, or ordering the obligor to provide health insurance coverage for the child under a policy available through the obligor’s employment;

The amount of periodic payments of fees and costs for a support enforcement agency, the issuing tribunal, and the obligee’s attorney, stated as sums certain; and

The amount of periodic payments of arrearages and interest on arrearages, stated as sums certain.

An employer shall comply with the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment for withholding from income with respect to:

The employer’s fee for processing an income-withholding order;

The maximum amount permitted to be withheld from the obligor’s income; and

The times within which the employer must implement the withholding order and forward the child support payment.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 152, § 10; 2009, ch. 152, § 36.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-33.2. (503)
Employer’s compliance with two or more income-withholding orders.

If an obligor’s employer receives two or more income-withholding orders with respect to the earnings of the same obligor, the employer satisfies the terms of the orders if the employer complies with the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment to establish the priorities for withholding and allocating income withheld for two or more child support obligees.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 152, § 10; 2009, ch. 152, § 37.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-33.3. (504)
Immunity from civil liability.

An employer that complies with an income-withholding order issued in another state in accordance with this chapter is not subject to civil liability to an individual or agency with regard to the employer’s withholding of child support from the obligor’s income.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 152, § 10; 2009, ch. 152, § 38.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-33.4. (505)
Penalties for noncompliance.

An employer that willfully fails to comply with an income-withholding order issued by another state and received for enforcement is subject to the same penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 152, § 10; 2009, ch. 152, § 39.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-33.5. (506)
Contest by obligor.

An obligor may contest the validity or enforcement of an income-withholding order issued in another state and received directly by an employer in this state by registering the order in a tribunal of this state and filing a contest to that order as provided in sections 14-12.2-35 through 14-12.2-46.4, or otherwise contesting the order in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

The obligor shall give notice of the contest to:

A support enforcement agency providing services to the obligee;

Each employer that has directly received an income-withholding order relating to the obligor; and

The person designated to receive payments in the income-withholding order or if no person is designated, to the obligee.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 152, § 10; 2009, ch. 152, § 40.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-34. (507)
Administrative enforcement of orders.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to enforce a support order or an income-withholding order, or both, issued in another state or a foreign support order may send the documents required for registering the order to a support enforcement agency of this state.

Upon receipt of the documents, the support enforcement agency, without initially seeking to register the order, shall consider and, if appropriate, use any administrative procedure authorized by the law of this state to enforce a support order or an income-withholding order, or both. If the obligor does not contest administrative enforcement, the order need not be registered. If the obligor contests the validity or administrative enforcement of the order, the support enforcement agency shall register the order pursuant to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 41.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

This section corresponds to section 507 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act approved in 1992. Section 14-12.2-33.1 corresponds to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (1996).

14-12.2-35. (601)
Registration of order for enforcement.

A support order or an income-withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order may be registered in this state for enforcement.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 42.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-36. (602)
Procedure to register order for enforcement.

Subject to section 14-12.2-47.6, a support order or income-withholding order of another state or a foreign support order may be registered in this state by sending the following records to the appropriate tribunal in this state:

A letter of transmittal to the tribunal requesting registration and enforcement;

Two copies, including one certified copy, of the order to be registered, including any modification of the order;

A sworn statement by the person requesting registration or a certified statement by the custodian of the records showing the amount of any arrearage;

The name of the obligor and, if known:

The obligor’s address and social security number;

The name and address of the obligor’s employer and any other source of income of the obligor; and

A description and the location of property of the obligor in this state not exempt from execution; and

Except as otherwise provided in section 14-12.2-24, name and address of the obligee and, if applicable, the person to whom support payments are to be remitted.

On receipt of a request for registration, the registering tribunal shall cause the order to be filed as an order of another state or foreign country, together with one copy of the documents and information, regardless of their form.

A petition or comparable pleading seeking a remedy that must be affirmatively sought under other law of this state may be filed at the same time as the request for registration or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for the remedy sought.

If two or more orders are in effect, the person requesting registration shall:

Furnish to the tribunal a copy of every support order asserted to be in effect in addition to the documents specified in this section;

Specify the order alleged to be the controlling order, if any; and

Specify the amount of consolidated arrears, if any.

A request for a determination of which is the controlling order may be filed separately or with a request for registration and enforcement or for registration and modification. The person requesting registration shall give notice of the requests to each party whose rights may be affected by the determination.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 43.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-37. (603)
Effect of registration for enforcement.

A support order or income-withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered when the order is filed in the registering tribunal of this state.

A registered order issued in another state or foreign country is enforceable in the same manner and is subject to the same procedures as an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, a registered order if the issuing tribunal had jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 44.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

Collateral References.

Validity, Construction, and Application of Full Faith and Credit for Child Support Orders Act (FFCCSOA), 28 USCS § 1738B - State Cases. 18 A.L.R.6th 97.

14-12.2-38. (604)
Choice of law.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the law of the issuing state or foreign country governs:

The nature, extent, amount, and duration of current payments under a registered support order;

The computation and payment of arrearages and accrual of interest on the arrearages under the support order; and

The existence and satisfaction of other obligations under the support order.

In a proceeding for arrearages under a registered support order, the statute of limitation of this state, or of the issuing state or foreign country, whichever is longer, applies.

A responding tribunal of this state shall apply the procedures and remedies of this state to enforce current support and collect arrears and interest due on a support order of another state or foreign country registered in this state.

After a tribunal of this or another state determines which is the controlling order and issues an order consolidating arrears, if any, a tribunal of this state shall prospectively apply the law of the state or foreign country issuing the controlling order, including its law on interest on arrears, on current and future support, and on consolidated arrears.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 45.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-39. (605)
Notice of registration of order.

When a support order or income-withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered, the registering tribunal of this state shall notify the nonregistering party. The notice must be accompanied by a copy of the registered order and the documents and relevant information accompanying the order.

A notice must inform the nonregistering party:

That a registered order is enforceable as of the date of registration in the same manner as an order issued by a tribunal of this state;

That a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order must be requested within twenty days after notice unless the registered order is subject to section 14-12.2-47.7;

That failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner will result in confirmation of the order and enforcement of the order and the alleged arrearages; and

Of the amount of any alleged arrearages.

If the registering party asserts that two or more orders are in effect, a notice must also:

Identify the two or more orders and the order alleged by the registering party to be the controlling order and the consolidated arrears, if any;

Notify the nonregistering party of the right to a determination of which is the controlling order;

State that the procedures provided in subsection 2 apply to the determination of which is the controlling order; and

State that failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the order alleged to be the controlling order in a timely manner may result in confirmation that the order is the controlling order.

Upon registration of an income-withholding order for enforcement, the support enforcement agency or the registering tribunal shall notify the obligor’s employer pursuant to the income-withholding requirements of chapter 14-09.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 11; 2009, ch. 152, § 46.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-40. (606)
Procedure to contest validity or enforcement of registered order.

A nonregistering party seeking to contest the validity or enforcement of a registered order in this state shall request a hearing in accordance with the notice provided in section 14-12.2-39. The nonregistering party may seek to vacate the registration, to assert any defense to an allegation of noncompliance with the registered order, or to contest the remedies being sought or the amount of any alleged arrearages pursuant to section 14-12.2-41.

If the nonregistering party fails to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner, the order is confirmed by operation of law.

If a nonregistering party requests a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order, the registering tribunal shall schedule the matter for hearing and give notice to the parties of the date, time, and place of the hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 12; 2009, ch. 152, § 47.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-41. (607)
Contest of registration or enforcement.

A party contesting the validity or enforcement of a registered order or seeking to vacate the registration has the burden of proving one or more of the following defenses:

The issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction over the contesting party;

The order was obtained by fraud;

The order has been vacated, suspended, or modified by a later order;

The issuing tribunal has stayed the order pending appeal;

There is a defense under the law of this state to the remedy sought;

Full or partial payment has been made;

The statute of limitation under section 14-12.2-38 precludes enforcement of some or all of the alleged arrearages; or

The alleged controlling order is not the controlling order.

If a party presents evidence establishing a full or partial defense under subsection 1, a tribunal may stay enforcement of the registered order, continue the proceeding to permit production of additional relevant evidence, and issue other appropriate orders. An uncontested portion of the registered order may be enforced by all remedies available under the law of this state.

If the contesting party does not establish a defense under subsection 1 to the validity or enforcement of the order, the registering tribunal shall issue an order confirming the order.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 48.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-42. (608)
Confirmed order.

Confirmation of a registered order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3.

14-12.2-43. (609)
Procedure to register child support order of another state for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child support order issued in another state shall register that order in this state in the same manner provided in sections 14-12.2-35 through 14-12.2-42 if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for modification.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 49.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-44. (610)
Effect of registration for modification.

A tribunal of this state may enforce a child support order of another state registered for purposes of modification, in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state, but the registered order may be modified only if the requirements of section 14-12.2-45 or 14-12.2-46.1 have been met.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 50.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”